Washington statutes.
RCW 42.04.060

Business hours—Posting on website.

Except as provided in section 3, chapter 32, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess., all state elective and appointive officers shall keep their offices open for the transaction of business for a minimum of forty hours per week, except weeks that include state legal holidays. Customary business hours must be posted on the agency or office's website and made known by other means designed to provide the public with notice.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 32 s 5; 2009 c 428 s 1; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 2; 1955 ex.s. c 9 s 3. Prior: 1951 c 100 ss 3, 4; 1941 c 113 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9963-1.]

NOTES:

Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 32: "The legislature declares that unprecedented revenue shortfalls necessitate immediate action to reduce expenditures during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium. From April 27, 2010, it is the intent of the legislature that state agencies of the legislative branch, judicial branch, and executive branch including institutions of higher education, shall achieve a reduction in government operating expenses as provided in this act. It is the legislature's intent that, to the extent that the reductions in expenditures reduce compensation costs, agencies and institutions shall strive to preserve family-wage jobs by reducing the impact of temporary layoffs on lower-wage jobs." [ 2010 1st sp.s. c 32 s 1.]

Conflict with federal requirements—2010 1st sp.s. c 32: "If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state." [ 2010 1st sp.s. c 32 s 11.]

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 32: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 27, 2010]." [ 2010 1st sp.s. c 32 s 13.]

Office hours of city, county, precinct: RCW 35.21.175, 36.16.100.